District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

38-2205

Sunset provision.

Expired. .

Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1406, 44 DCR 7378
1981 Ed., § 31-2525.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 38-2201.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 38-2201.